Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 7. Power Projects

§ 41-7-701.
Irrigation districts may undertake power projects.

Any irrigation district heretofore organized and existing under and by virtue of the provisions of chapter 2, Session Laws of Wyoming, Special Session, 1920, as amended, codified and compiled in W.S.

41-7-101

through

41-7-603

[§§

41-7-101

through

41-7-415

], as now amended, is hereby authorized and given the power to provide for the construction, building and development of suitable works and structures, and to purchase, extend, enlarge, operate and maintain constructed works and structures suitable for the operation, maintenance, development and distribution of hydroelectric energy and power.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 49, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-323.1.

Cross references. —

As to public irrigation and power districts generally, see §§

41-7-801

to

41-7-835

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability for overflow of water confined or diverted for public water power purposes, 91 ALR3d 1065.

§ 41-7-702.
Resolution of commissioners.

Whenever the commissioners of any duly organized and existing irrigation district, heretofore or hereafter organized under the laws of the state of Wyoming, shall determine by a majority vote thereof that it is and would be beneficial and for the best interest of the landowners and entrymen therein that the development and distribution of hydroelectric energy and power is feasible, necessary and required for the complete and full construction and building of appropriate irrigation works necessary and required for the improvement of the water supply for the landowners and entrymen therein, they may adopt and approve an appropriate resolution stating their determination thereof.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 49, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 41-323.2.

§ 41-7-703.
Report made to district court.

Upon the adoption of such a resolution, the said commissioners shall file an appropriate report with the district court of the county having jurisdiction of said irrigation district proceeding of the same nature and kind as provided in W.S.

41-7-305

through

41-7-307

, for the construction of irrigation works.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 49, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 41-323.3.

§ 41-7-704.
Hearing on objections to report.

Upon the filing of the said report, the court or judge thereof shall make an order fixing the time and place when and where all persons interested may appear and object to the confirmation thereof and all of the provisions of W.S.

41-7-308

through

41-7-314

[§§

41-7-308

through

41-7-313

], shall be followed and be applicable thereto.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 49, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 41-323.4.

Editor's notes. —

Section

41-7-314

, referred to in this section, does not relate to the commissioner's report.

§ 41-7-705.
Notices; how given and served.

All required notices shall be given and served in the same manner as provided in the said Irrigation District Law [§§

41-7-101

through

41-7-415

] of the state of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 49, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 41-323.5.

§ 41-7-706.
Notices; contents.

Such notice shall show the court in which said petition is filed, give a general description of the proposed works, state the time and place fixed by the court when and where the hearing on said petition will be had, and it shall require all persons interested to appear at the time and place therein stated, then and there to show cause if any they have, why said irrigation district should not proceed with plans and specifications for the construction or purchase as need be of the incidental necessary and required works for the development, distribution and sale of hydroelectric energy and power.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 49, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 41-323.6.

§ 41-7-707.
Order of court authorizing project; procedure commissioners to follow.

If the court at the hearing so petitioned for, noticed and held shall decide the issues in favor of the petitioners the court shall enter an order approving and confirming the petition and authorize the commissioners of said district to proceed as provided in the irrigation district laws of the state of Wyoming, and in particular as provided in W.S.

41-7-305

through

41-7-315

, and the amendments thereof, to make investigations, surveys and lay out said proposed work, to make maps, plans and profiles and other specifications thereof and to negotiate for the purchase of needed works and equipment as is required and report their findings to the court for a hearing thereon which said plans, proposals, etc. shall be subject to change and amendments as might be beneficial and as provided in said irrigation district laws of the state of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 49, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 41-323.7.

§ 41-7-708.
Approved project may proceed as incident to existing system; disposition of excess energy.

After the approval of the court the board of commissioners of said irrigation district shall be authorized to proceed with the construction, acquisition or purchase of all works and equipment required to provide for the generation, distribution and sale of hydroelectric energy and power as an incident to its existing or proposed water storage and distribution system and that it shall have the power to sell, distribute or otherwise dispose of hydroelectric energy not necessary for the uses and purposes of the district.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 49, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 41-323.8.

§ 41-7-709.
Determination and apportionment of cost of power portion of project.

That if any project or amended project includes plans for the generation of electric energy and power, the board of commissioners shall ascertain the total cost of all of the property and works which are necessary to be used in connection with the generation, sale and distribution of electric energy and power as set forth in the plans of the district, and shall also ascertain what portion of the assessment of benefit to accrue to each tract or parcel of land embraced or to be included within said irrigation district consists of the properties and works which are necessary and required to be so used.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 49, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 41-323.9.

§ 41-7-710.
Costs of irrigation works and power project separately apportioned.

It shall be the duty of the board of commissioners to apportion the respective costs of irrigation works as distinguished from the property and works required and necessary for the generation, distribution and sale of electrical energy and power to each of said units of construction.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 49, § 10; W.S. 1957, § 41-323.10.

§ 41-7-711.
Assessments for power project to be determined; reported to court.

The commissioners shall likewise determine the portion of assessments, if any, which is attributable to the cost of the properties and works which are necessary to be used in connection with the generation, distribution and sale of electric energy and power and the same shall be reported to and be one (1) of the items for determination and confirmation of the court.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 49, § 11; W.S. 1957, § 41-323.11.

§ 41-7-712.
Determination of rate of assessment.

The commissioners shall also determine the rate per acre of the assessment upon each tract or parcel of land assessed, for the costs of construction or acquisition of the properties and works which are necessary to be used in connection with the generation of electric energy or power, and if no assessment of such costs is made upon any tract or parcel a statement of that fact shall be made.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 49, § 12; W.S. 1957, § 41-323.12.

§ 41-7-713.
Provisions governing levying, approving and collecting assessments.

Upon the filing by the commissioners of a report to construct the initial unit or units pursuant to an original plan of construction or for any subsequent changes therein, the same proceedings shall be had and taken as required in the Wyoming Irrigation District Law [§§

41-7-101

through

41-7-415

] and herein for levying, approving and collecting assessments to meet the costs of the units to be constructed, erected or purchased as was required to provide for an assessment to meet the cost of irrigation works or of the power unit or units first constructed.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 49, § 13; W.S. 1957, § 41-323.13.

§ 41-7-714.
Plan may be divided; procedure.

Any approved plan may be divided by amendment into smaller parcels or units after notice and hearing on a report and petition for supplemental or amended assessment rolls and proposals.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 49, § 14; W.S. 1957, § 41-323.14.

§ 41-7-715.
Additions to projects; amended or supplemental petitions.

If in the judgment of the board of commissioners additional properties or works are necessary and required at any time for the development and sale of electric energy and power, the same may be petitioned for, authorized and made or acquired, as provided herein, by amended or supplemental petition as provided herein for the original construction or acquisitions thereof.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 49, § 15; W.S. 1957, § 41-323.15.

§ 41-7-716.
Revenue from sale of power to be determined.

Upon the levy of any assessment to a person thereof, as provided in this act [§§

41-7-701

through

41-7-718

], the board of commissioners shall ascertain the total net revenue which has been derived by the district from the generation and sale and distribution of electric power since the levy of the last previous assessment or portion thereof.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 49, § 16; W.S. 1957, § 41-323.16.

§ 41-7-717.
Power revenue to be deducted from assessments.

From the assessments required upon each tract or parcel of land that has been assessed for the cost of the property comprising the portion of the project used or to be used for the generation, sale and distribution of electric energy and power there shall be deducted by the commissioners of the district and all officials making the levy against each separately owned tract or parcel of land within said irrigation district an amount equal to said portion of the total net revenue ascertained to have been derived from generation, development and sale of electric energy and power as the portion of the cost assessed under this act [§§

41-7-701

through

41-7-718

] against each separate taxpayer bears to the total of said costs. In making such deduction, fractions of cents upon each tract shall be disregarded and no error in the computation of said deductions shall invalidate any such assessment or levy.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 49, § 17; W.S. 1957, § 41-323.17.

§ 41-7-718.
Liberal construction; restrictions; regulation by public service commission.

This act [§§

41-7-701

through

41-7-718

] shall be construed liberally for the purpose of making it possible for irrigation districts by the development and sale of hydroelectric energy and power through the construction or purchase of necessary and required properties and works to create sufficient income to make said works in connection with their irrigation works a feasible project, to save, conserve and preserve their full water rights under the laws of Wyoming.

The generation of electric energy and power under the provisions of this act shall be restricted to the generation of hydroelectric energy and power for wholesale transmission and sale and such irrigation and public power districts established under the provisions of said act shall be subject to the regulation of the public service commission of Wyoming in the establishment of wholesale rates and transmission facilities, applicable to any other public utility generating electric energy and power for wholesale transmission and sale.

History.

Laws 1963, ch. 49, § 18; W.S. 1957, § 41-323.18.